Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202046-1125
Permit denial, suspension, revocation;
grounds.

The district shall deny, refuse renewal of, suspend,
or revoke a permit applied for or issued pursuant to section 46-1117 on any of the following
grounds:

(1) Practice of fraud or deceit in obtaining a permit; or

(2) Violation of any of the provisions of the Nebraska Chemigation Act
or any standards or rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant
to such act.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 25;

Laws 2011, LB2, § 5.